Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 3 Establishment of Regional School Districts
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-3-1.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to assist communities within the state to operate schools on a more efficient and economic basis through the development of regional school districts and to enhance the services of the schools in line with present day needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-2.
Purposes of regional school district schools.

Regional school districts may be organized for the establishment of schools for the purposes enumerated in this section:

To operate all schools and educational services;

To operate elementary or secondary schools;

To operate vocational or technical schools;

To operate a community college; and

To operate other schools as the people of the regional school district may determine, subject to the approval by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-3.
Regional school educational services.

Regional school districts formed under the provisions of this chapter to operate any one of the types of schools listed in §

16-3-2

may establish any one or more of the following types of services for all the pupils of the regional school district if so specified in the agreement:

To provide education for individuals with disabilities;

To provide transportation for all schools in the regional district;

To provide school health services;

To provide guidance services;

To provide either general supervisory services for all the schools of the area or supervisory services in some special field such as vocational education; and

To provide other educational services as the people of the regional district may determine, subject to approval by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 22; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 22.

16-3-3.1.
Creation of regional school district planning board.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall order the creation of a regional school district planning board for the purpose of conducting a study of the feasibility of regionalization or other cooperative ventures if any of the following conditions are found to exist:

High school enrollments are below or are projected to be less than one hundred (100) per grade;

Per pupil spending is sixty-six percent (66%) or less of the statewide average for three (3) consecutive years;

The appropriating authority finds that the community does not have the fiscal and economic capacity to provide educational programs consistent with law and regulations, based on factors included but not limited to per pupil assessed valuation, and personal income;

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education determines that a school district does not have the capacity to comply with the Basic Education Program (BEP).

In ordering the creation of a regional school district planning board the commissioner shall determine which cities or towns will be required to participate.

In mandating a regionalization study, the commissioner should make certain that the study address the following questions:

Will regionalization allow the cities or towns to offer a complete K through 12 educational program (in particular, if the town or city currently “tuitions out” some of its students)?

Will regionalization allow the school system to offer a more comprehensive and/or diversified program for high school students (i.e., advanced language, mathematics, etc., specialized and/or remedial courses)?

Will regionalization, by its size alone, allow savings through “economies of scale”?

What effect will regionalization have on transportation costs for the school district and transportation times for students?

What effect will regionalization have on class size and will that be beneficial or detrimental to the students’ classroom performance, socialization skills, and/or participation in school activities?

How will “spending per pupil” change with regionalization?

Are there weaknesses in the curriculum or programs within a district that can be remedied by regionalization with a district with compensating strengths?

What effect will existing labor contracts and bargaining agreements have on regionalization efforts?

What new or diverse facility requirements will be needed if regionalization occurs and what are the costs of these facilities?

What effect will regionalization have on disadvantaged and special populations within the districts?

Will extracurricular activities and/or the student support services (guidance, library, etc.) be enhanced by regionalization?

Will regionalization permit sufficient “local control” for all districts involved to assure parents that they have some influence on the education of their children?

Will regionalization take into effect the unique socio-economic and cultural heritage of the participating cities and/or towns?

Will regionalization have any effect on the vocational education program?

Do comparative studies of regionalization in similar areas show improved school quality? and

Do the regionalization plans take into effect projected demographic trends?

The regional school district planning board shall report its findings within eighteen (18) months of its creation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 6; P.L. 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

16-3-4.
Creation of planning committee — Appropriations.

Any city or town, by majority vote of its appropriating authority, may create a special unpaid committee to be known as a regional school district planning committee, to consist of three (3) members, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the president of the city or town council and one of whom shall be appointed by the chairperson of the school committee; and shall at the same meeting appropriate for the expense of the committee a sum, not exceeding one tenth of one percent (.1%) of the assessed valuation of the city or town in the preceding year.

The committee may consist of more than three (3) members; if this is the case then two-thirds (2/3) shall be appointed by the president of the city or town council, and the remaining members by the chairperson of the school committee.

In cities and towns where the mayor or town administrator is directly elected, the committee shall be appointed in equal numbers of members by the mayor or town administrator, president of the city or town council, and chairperson of the school committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3511, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-1

; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-5.
Formation of regional planning board.

Regional school district planning committees from any two (2) or more cities or towns may join together to form a regional school district planning board or boards. A regional school district planning board shall organize immediately upon its formation by the election of a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3511, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-2

; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-6.
Studies and reports by planning board.

It shall be the duty of the regional school district planning board to study the advisability of establishing a regional school district, its organization, operation, and control, and of constructing, maintaining, and operating a school or schools and the types of services to be performed by the school or schools to serve the needs of the district; to estimate the construction and its operating costs; to investigate the methods of financing the school or schools, and any other matters pertaining to the organization and operation of a regional school district; and to submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the city or town councils of the several participating cities or towns. Planning boards created under §

16-3-3.1

shall include in their report the items listed in §

16-3-3.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3511, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-3

; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-7.
Recommendations as to establishment of regional district.

The regional district planning board may recommend that there shall be established a regional school district which may include all the cities or towns represented by its membership, or alternatively, any specified combination of the cities or towns. If the regional district planning board so recommends, it shall submit a proposed agreement or agreements setting forth as to each alternative recommendation, if such be made, the following:

The number, composition, method of selection, and terms of office of the members of the regional district school committee.

The cities or towns in which the regional district school or schools are to be located.

The type of regional district school or schools and the type of services to be undertaken by the regional school district.

The method of apportioning the expenses of the regional school district, and the method of apportioning the costs of school construction, including any interest and retirement of principal of any bonds or other obligations issued by the district among the several cities or towns comprising the district, and the time and manner of payment of the shares of the several cities or towns of the expenses.

The method by which school transportation shall be provided, and if transportation is to be furnished by the district, the manner in which the expenses shall be borne by the several cities or towns.

The terms by which any city or town may be admitted to or separated from the regional school district.

The method by which the agreement may be amended.

The detailed procedure for the preparation and adoption of an annual budget.

Any other matters, not incompatible with law, which the board may deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3511, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-4

; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-7.1.
Equalized representation.

Any other provisions of this chapter or any other general or public law to the contrary notwithstanding, members of the regional district school committee shall be selected from voting districts as nearly equal in population as is practicable within each city or town in the district, and member cities or towns in the districts shall be entitled to representation on the school committee in proportion to their population.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-7.2.
Transfer of North Providence school department.

The North Providence school department shall be transferred from the Providence vocational area to the William E. Davies vocational area.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 298, § 1.

16-3-8.
Submission of agreement to board of regents for elementary and secondary education and the cities or towns.

Copies of the agreement drawn by the regional district planning board in accordance with §

16-3-7

shall be submitted to the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education for review and recommendation to the several cities or towns for their acceptance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3511, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-4

; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-9.
Action by city or town on recommendations.

Each city or town council of the respective cities or towns shall, upon receipt of a recommendation that a regional school district should be formed, and of a proposed agreement submitted in accordance with the provisions of §§

16-3-4

to

16-3-8

, and with the approval required by §

16-3-8

, direct the city or town clerk to cause the question of accepting the provisions of this and the following sections and the proposed agreement or agreements to be placed on the official warrant for the warning and calling of a special or annual financial town meeting or referendum to be held in either case within six (6) months after receipt of the recommendation by the city or town council, in substantially the following form:

“Shall the city or town accept the provisions of chapter 3 of title 16, providing for the establishment of a regional school district, together with the cities or towns of
and
, and the construction, maintenance, and operation of regional schools by the district in accordance with the provisions of a proposed agreement filed with the city or town council?”

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3511, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-5

; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-10.
Acceptance by voters — Establishment of regional school district.

If a majority of the voters voting on the question in each of the several cities or towns shall vote in the affirmative to accept this chapter, the provisions of this chapter shall apply, and the proposed regional school district shall be deemed to be established in accordance with the terms of the agreement adopted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3511, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-6

; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-11.
School committees of regional school districts — Powers and duties.

A regional school district established under the provisions of §

16-3-10

shall be a body politic and corporate with all the powers and duties conferred by law upon school committees and with the following additional powers and duties:

To adopt a name and a corporate seal.

To sue and be sued but only to the same extent and upon the same conditions that a city or town may sue or be sued.

To acquire by purchase, gift, or other means of transfer or by condemnation, land, and improvements within the district as a site for a school or schools. To acquire also by this method the rights of way and other easements as may be required in connection with the use of the site.

For the purpose of acquiring land by condemnation for the site, the regional district is given all the powers conferred upon cities or towns for the condemnation of land for school purposes by §

16-9-5

; provided, that the amount of land taken by the committee may exceed five (5) acres but shall not exceed thirty (30) acres for any one building site. The description, plat, and statement of the land taken under this chapter shall be signed by the chairperson of the regional district school committee and filed in the records of land evidence as provided in §

16-9-6

. The owners of land or any persons entitled to any estate or interest in it taken by the committee shall have the same right of petition, the right of jury trial, and all other rights under the provisions of §§

16-9-7

and

16-9-8

.

Upon the filing of the description, plat, and statement of the land taken, the title to the land shall vest absolutely and in fee simple in the regional school district notwithstanding that any of the land taken is devoted to a public use, and the district, acting by and through the district committee and its duly authorized agents, may immediately enter and take possession of the land without any process of law required by statute or common law, and remove any or all buildings, property, or other impediments, and occupy, use, and improve the land for the purposes of this chapter notwithstanding any other provision of law.

The district, through its committee, is authorized and empowered to pay for the cost of acquiring land for the school site from the proceeds received from the sale of bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether the property is acquired by purchase or by condemnation, or partly by purchase and partly by condemnation.

To secure competent architectural and engineering services for the taking of surveys, the preparation of plans and specifications for the construction and equipment of a school or schools in the district, and to employ clerical assistance as may be necessary.

To construct, furnish, and equip schools and improve the grounds upon which the schools are located and to make additions to the schools as may be needed.

To make all contracts and agreements that may be necessary for the exercise of the powers vested in the district school committee by subdivisions (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection;

To issue under its corporate name and seal bonds in serial form to an amount not exceeding the debt limits as described in this chapter. The bonds shall be signed by the chairperson and treasurer of the regional school district committee; the principal and interest shall be payable in any coin or currency of the United States that, at the time of payment, is legal tender for public and private debts, and the debt secured by the bonds shall be obligatory on the district to the same extent as other debts lawfully contracted by the district.

To borrow temporarily and to issue temporary notes of the district, the proceeds of which shall be used only for the purposes set forth in subdivisions (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection. Each authorized issue shall constitute a separate loan. Each issue may be for a period of not more than three (3) years and notes issued for a shorter period may be refunded or renewed from time to time by the issue of other temporary notes maturing within the required period of three (3) years, provided, that the period from the date of issue of the original loan to the date of maturity of the refunding or renewal loans shall not be more than three (3) years. Temporary notes of the district shall be signed by the chairperson and treasurer of the regional district school committee, and may bear interest or be sold at a discount. The period and discount or interest rate and other particulars of the temporary notes shall be fixed by the district committee. The temporary notes and renewal notes, including interest or discount on the notes and the expense of preparing, issuing, and marketing the notes, shall, unless otherwise taken care of, be funded by the issue of serial bonds under the provisions of subdivision (7) of this subsection. The aggregate principal amount of temporary notes issued and outstanding under this subdivision shall not at any time exceed the sum of the serial bonds authorized to be issued.

To incur temporary debt after the district school or schools are constructed and in operation in anticipation of revenue to be received.

To apply for and receive, accept, and use any state or federal funds or assistance, or both, as may be provided, whether in the form of a grant or a loan, or both, on the same basis as other school districts, but subject to the provisions of this chapter; to receive, accept, and use any gift from private sources; to receive and disburse funds for any district purpose.

To publish an annual report containing a detailed financial statement showing the total receipts and expenditures of the period covered by the report together with additional information relating to the maintenance and operating of the school or schools as may be deemed necessary by the regional district school committee.

To engage legal counsel.

To engage and employ a superintendent of the district who may also be a principal of a district school or schools on a contractual basis for either a definite or indefinite term as the regional school district school committee shall decide. The person employed shall have all the powers and duties imposed upon a superintendent of schools by law.

The powers, duties, and liabilities of a regional school district as set forth in this chapter, together with any other powers and duties pertaining to school committees prescribed by the laws of this state and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, shall be vested in and exercised by a regional district school committee organized in accordance with the terms of the agreement. The committee shall choose by ballot a chairperson from its membership. It shall also appoint a clerk and a treasurer who may be the same person, and who need not be a member or members of the committee. The treasurer shall receive and take charge of all money belonging to the district and shall pay all bills and indebtedness of the district that have been approved by the committee; provided, that expenditures, encumbrances, and accruals shall not in any fiscal year exceed the total revenue belonging to the district. Should the treasurer estimate that actual expenses may exceed total available revenue in any fiscal year, he or she shall notify the school committee and the superintendent of schools, and the chief elected officials of the cities or towns. Purchase orders or financial commitments shall not be authorized even on the order of the school committee unless it can be proven that there will not be an excess of expenditures, encumbrances, and accruals over revenues. The clerk and the treasurer shall give bond to the district in the sum and with the surety as shall be satisfactory to the committee and conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the office.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit a regional district school committee from negotiating and contracting with school employees and teachers for services to be rendered in the ensuing fiscal years pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28.

The regional district school committee shall annually cause an audit to be made of the accounts of the regional school district and on completion of each audit, a report shall be made to the chairperson of the committee.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, the requirement defined in this subsection shall apply. The school committee of each school district shall be responsible for maintaining a school budget which does not result in a debt.

The school committee shall, within thirty (30) days after the close of the first and second quarters of the state’s fiscal year, adopt the budget as may be necessary to enable it to operate without incurring a debt, as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

In the event that any obligation, encumbrance or expenditure by a superintendent of schools or a school committee is in excess of the amount budgeted or that any revenue is less than the amount budgeted, the school committee shall within five (5) working days of its discovery of potential or actual over expenditure or revenue deficiency, submit a written statement of the amount of and cause for the over obligation or over expenditure or revenue deficiency to the town council president and such other person who by local charter or statute serves as the city or town’s executive officer; the statement shall further include a statement of the school committee’s plan for corrective actions necessary to meet the requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection. The plan shall be approved by the auditor general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 72; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 44, § 2.

16-3-12.
Regional school district financial meeting — Special meetings.

The regional school district financial meeting to which all the voters qualified to vote in their respective cities or towns on any proposition for the imposition of a tax or the expenditure of money shall be held on the first Monday in February of each year at eight o’clock (8:00) p.m. at the regional school district high school or any other location that the regional school district committee may publicly designate in advance; provided, however, that:

The Exeter-West Greenwich regional school district meeting shall be held on the second (2nd) or third (3rd) Monday of April of each year at the discretion of the school committee at seven o’clock (7:00) p.m.; and

The Chariho Regional School District meeting for the calendar year 2002 only shall be held no later than March 23, 2002 at a time and date to be determined by the regional district school committee. The regional district school committee shall prepare and approve a budget no later than thirty (30) days prior to the annual meeting date. The regional district school committee shall adopt a final proposed budget no later than ten (10) days prior to the annual meeting date and the treasurer of the regional school district shall certify the charge per pupil to each district treasurer by April 9, 2002.

Special meetings may be called by vote of the regional school district committee or upon petition of two hundred (200) district voters filed in writing with the committee; provided, however, that for the Exeter-West Greenwich Regional School District, a petition of five percent (5%) of registered voters shall be required to call a special meeting and the petition must be filed on or before May 15 of any year. The petition shall be presented in proper format with the signature, the printed name and the address of each registered voter, to the school committee at a duly convened school committee meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 27; P.L. 2002, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-13.
Powers of regional school district financial meeting.

The regional school district financial meeting shall determine the regional school district budget as to overall amounts, the decision as to the levying of taxes covering the functions of the regional school district, the purchase of land and the construction of buildings, the extension of the scope of the functions of the regional school district as approved by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, and the election of members to the regional school district school committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-14.
Regional representatives.

In cities and towns that do not have a regional school district financial meeting, the regional school committee or an alternative mechanism approved by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall determine the regional school district budget as to overall amounts, the purchase of land, and the construction of buildings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-15.
Moderator and clerk.

The moderator of the regional school district financial meeting shall be the chairperson of the regional school district committee and the clerk of the meeting shall be the clerk of the regional school district committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-16.
Operation expenses.

The school district financial meeting or the regional representatives under the provisions of §

16-3-14

shall not be subject to tax limitations for operational purposes except as specifically provided in the agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-17.
Capital outlay debt limitation.

The regional school district financial meeting or regional representatives under the provisions of §

16-3-14

shall be subject to the statutory debt limit for incurring debt for capital outlay purposes in those regional school districts embracing all the educational functions of the area to ten percent (10%) of the full valuation of the taxable real property within the district as determined by the department of administration. If this results in increasing the debt requirements over the debt limits of any town or city which represents less than half (1/2) of the true valuation of the regional school district, this shall not be considered as a violation of the debt limit in the town or city.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-18.
Transfer and use of plant.

In any instance where the regional school district embraces functions formerly performed by towns and cities within their borders which require the utilization of a plant, the plant shall be transferred to the regional school district or rented by it, and if transferred the regional school district shall assume responsibility for the servicing of outstanding debts on the plant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-19.
Costs of operation — Payment of debts — Apportionment among district members.

The cost of the operation of a regional school district and the cost of payment of an indebtedness of the regional school district authorized by the regional school district financial meeting or regional representatives under the provisions of §

16-3-14

shall be borne by the member towns and/or cities that comprise the regional school district in that proportion that the equalized weighted assessed valuation of the property of the towns and cities that lie within the regional school district as determined from the latest figure certified by the department of revenue bears to the total equalized weighted assessed valuation of the total property of the regional school district, or, if the figures from the department of revenue are not available, the latest figures on equalized weighted assessed valuation used by the state department of elementary and secondary education in determining equalization aid under chapter 7 of this title shall be used.

However, the apportionment of the cost of operating a regional school district and the cost of paying indebtedness may be determined by the members towns and/or cities that comprise the regional school district in a manner approved by a majority vote within each member community.

On or before March 1 in each year the treasurer of the regional school district shall determine the proportionate share of the cost of the operation and the cost of the capital debt service payments of the regional school district for the next regional school district fiscal year to be borne by the towns and/or cities that comprise the regional school district in the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of this section, and he or she shall notify the town or city treasurer of the towns and/or cities comprising the regional school district of the total amount of money necessary to be raised from the regional school district taxpayers of each town or city for the operation of the regional school district for the fiscal year following.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 72; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 2.

16-3-20.
Appropriations by member towns.

Each city or town that is a member of a regional school district shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay its proportionate share of the interest on the bonds and notes issued and outstanding under authority of this chapter, and also to pay its proportionate share of the principal of the bonds and notes maturing in any one year until the bonds and notes are fully paid.

Each city or town that is a member of the district shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay its proportionate share of the operation of the regional school district in accordance with the terms of the agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 5.

16-3-21.
Payments by members.

The town or city treasurer of each town or city of the regional school district shall forward to the regional school district treasurer on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1 one-fourth (1/4) of the amount due for the operation of the regional school district for the fiscal year beginning July 1 from each town or city or parts thereof comprising the regional school district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-22.
Regional school fiscal year.

The regional school district fiscal years shall begin on July 1.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-23.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-3-24.
Additional state assistance.

In the event the general assembly shall enact legislation providing for financial assistance to cities and towns for school construction or for assisting the cities and towns in servicing the debt already incurred for the construction of schools, any regional school district shall be entitled to share in the aid in the same manner as any city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 1.

16-3-25.
Districts organized prior to 1959.

A regional school district organized prior to January 1, 1959, shall be governed by the provisions of the act establishing it and the provisions of this chapter not inconsistent with it.

Amendments to the date of financial district meetings shall not be considered inconsistent with acts establishing pre-1959 regional school districts provided those amendments are limited to one year only.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 197, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 6, § 1.

16-3-26.
Appropriation for regionalization studies.

The cost of conducting the studies required under §

16-3-3.1

shall be borne by an annual state appropriation. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall establish regulations necessary to implement this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 6.